District of Columbia statutes.
25-824

Revocation when wholesale or retail licensee is subject to undue influence by manufacturer.

(a)

If a manufacturer of alcoholic beverages, whether licensed by this title or not, shall have such a substantial interest, whether direct or indirect, in the business of a wholesale or retail licensee or in the premises on which the licensee’s business is conducted as, in the judgment of the Board, may tend to influence the licensee to purchase alcoholic beverages from the manufacturer, the Board may revoke the license of the licensee.

(b)

This section shall not apply to the wholesale license held by a person not licensed as a manufacturer in the District owning an establishment for the manufacture of alcoholic beverages outside of the District.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 330, ch. 4, § 18
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 902, ch. 756, § 15
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 10, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(6), 30 DCR 5927
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1981 Ed., § 25-824.
1973 Ed., § 25-119.